lt-LT: Parkavimo jutiklio tipas: Elektromagnetinis (EM); Optinis; Radaras; Ultragarsinis; Kita
ja: 駐車センサータイプ: 電磁式 (EM); 光学式; レーダー; 超音波式; その他
ko: 주차 센서 유형: 전자기식(EM); 광학식; 레이더; 초음파; 기타
es: Tipo de sensor de estacionamiento: Electromagnético (EM); Óptico; Radar; Ultrasónico; Otro
en: Parking sensor type: Electromagnetic (EM); Optical; Radar; Ultrasonic; Other
sv: Typ av parkeringssensor: Elektromagnetisk (EM); Optisk; Radar; Ultraljud; Övrigt
tr: Park sensörü tipi: Elektromanyetik (EM); Optik; Radar; Ultrasonik; Diğer
sk-SK: Typ parkovacieho senzora: Elektromagnetické (EM); Optické; Radarové; Ultrazvukové; Iné
it: Tipo di sensore di parcheggio: Elettromagnetico (EM); Ottico; Radar; A ultrasuoni; Altro
vi: Loại cảm biến đỗ xe: Điện từ (EM); Quang học; Radar; Siêu âm; Khác
pt-PT: Tipo de sensor de estacionamento: Eletromagnético (EM); Ótico; Radar; Ultrassónico; Outro
ru: Тип датчика парковки: Электромагнитный (ЭМ); Оптический; Радарный; Ультразвуковой; Другое
hu: Parkolóérzékelő típusa: Elektromágneses (EM); Optikai; Radar; Ultrahangos; Egyéb
sl-SI: Vrsta parkirnega senzorja: Elektromagnetni (EM); Optični; Radarski; Ultrazvočni; Drugo
de: Sensortyp des Parksensors: Elektromagnetisch (EM); Optisch; Radar; Ultraschall; Sonstige
pt-BR: Tipo de sensor de estacionamento: Eletromagnético (EM); Óptico; Radar; Ultrassônico; Outro
bg-BG: Тип сензор за паркиране: Електромагнитен (EM); Оптичен; Радарен; Ултразвуков; Друго
hr-HR: Vrsta parkirnog osjetnika: Elektromagnetski (EM); Optički; Radarski; Ultrazvučni; Ostalo
pl: Typ czujnika parkowania: Elektromagnetyczny (EM); Optyczny; Radarowy; Ultradźwiękowy; Inne
zh-TW: 停車感測器類型: 電磁 (EM); 光學; 雷達; 超音波; 其他
ro-RO: Tipul senzorului de parcare: Electromagnetic (EM); Optic; Radar; Ultrasunete; Altele
fr: Type de capteur de stationnement: Électromagnétique (EM); Optique; Radar; À ultrasons; Autre
da: Parkeringssensortype: Elektromagnetisk (EM); Optisk; Radar; Ultralyd; Anden
nl: Parkeersensor type: Elektromagnetisch (EM); Optisch; Radar; Ultrasoon; Overig
zh-CN: 泊车传感器类型: 电磁 (EM); 光学; 雷达; 超声波; 其他
cs: Typ parkovacího senzoru: Elektromagnetické (EM); Optické; Radarové; Ultrazvukové; Jiné
th: ประเภทเซ็นเซอร์จอดรถ: แม่เหล็กไฟฟ้า (EM); ออปติคัล; เรดาร์; อัลตราโซนิก; อื่นๆ
fi: Pysäköintianturin tyyppi: Sähkömagneettinen (EM); Optinen; Tutka; Ultraääni; Muu
el: Τύπος αισθητήρα στάθμευσης: Ηλεκτρομαγνητικός (EM); Οπτικός; Ραντάρ; Υπερηχητικός; Άλλο
nb: Parkeringssensortype: Elektromagnetisk (EM); Optisk; Radar; Ultralyd; Annet